Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-501
Waterworks; construction; right of eminent domain; procedure.

When a system of waterworks shall have been adopted in a city of the primary class and the people shall have voted to borrow money to aid their construction, the mayor and city council may (1) construct and maintain such system of waterworks, either within or without the corporate limits of the city, (2) make all needful rules and regulations concerning the use of such waterworks, and (3) do all acts necessary for the construction, completion, and management and control of such waterworks, including the exercise of the right of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 112, p. 118;

R.S.1913, § 4516;

C.S.1922, § 3902;

C.S.1929, § 15-501;

R.S.1943, § 15-501;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 47, p. 467;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 103.